Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1019.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 10, 1974 (P.L.852, No.287), referred to as the Underground Utility Line Protection Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 6.2. (a) Any construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, improvement or maintenance of gathering lines that requires use of steel products shall only use steel products produced in the United States.(b) This section shall apply to construction of gathering lines performed on or after the effective date of this section.12345678910111213141516171819202122 (c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Gathering line" means a pipeline used to transport natural gas from a production facility to a transmission line."Steel products" shall have the same meaning as defined in section 6 of the act of March 3, 1978 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Steel Products Procurement Act.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1019PN1099 - 2 - 123456789